Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2439.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9304(f) and (h) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 9304. Grants to veterans' service officer programs.* * *(f) Amount of grants.--The department shall determine the annual allocation to each of the designated veterans' service organizations based on the spending plan submitted under subsection (e) for the upcoming [fiscal] calendar year and on actual recoveries from the previous [fiscal] calendar year. If the total appropriation totals less than the collective spending plans, the department shall prorate the allocations among eligible organizations based on the spending plan and past 1234567891011121314151617 performance.* * *(h) Reporting requirements.--On or before [October] March 1 of each year, designated veterans' service organizations participating in the program established by this section shall file a written report with the Adjutant General and the Deputy Adjutant General for Veterans' Affairs and send copies to the chairman and minority chairman of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate and the chairman and minority chairman of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives and State Veterans' Commission. The report shall contain the following information:(1) A description of all veterans' service officer activities, an accounting of recoveries and a listing of volunteer hours for the preceding [Commonwealth fiscal] calendar year.(2) A proposed budget and spending plan for the [Commonwealth fiscal] calendar year beginning on [July 1] JANUARY 1 of the year following the filing of the report.(3) An accounting of its expenditures from grants awarded under this program, audited by a certified public accountant for the preceding [Commonwealth fiscal] calendar year.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.SECTION 2. THE AMENDMENT OF 51 PA.C.S. § 9304(F) AND (H) SHALL APPLY BEGINNING WITH GRANTS AWARDED FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2028.SECTION 3. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT JANUARY 1, 2027.20260HB2439PN3282 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930